Hawaii statutes.
§576B-707 Contest of registered Convention
support order. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this article, sections
576B-605 through 576B-608 apply to a contest of a registered Convention support
order.

(b) A party contesting a registered Convention
support order shall file a contest not later than thirty days after notice of
the registration, but if the contesting party does not reside in the United
States, the contest shall be filed not later than sixty days after notice of
the registration.

(c) If the nonregistering party fails to
contest the registered Convention support order by the time specified in
subsection (b), the order is enforceable.

(d) A contest of a registered Convention
support order may be based only on grounds set forth in section 576B-708. The
contesting party bears the burden of proof.

(e) In a contest of a registered Convention
support order, a tribunal of this State:

(1) Is bound by the findings of fact on which the
foreign tribunal based its jurisdiction; and

(2) May not review the merits of the order.

(f) A tribunal of this State deciding a
contest of a registered Convention support order shall promptly notify the
parties of its decision.

(g) A challenge or appeal, if any, does not
stay the enforcement of a Convention support order unless there are exceptional
circumstances. [L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next